Utah statutes.
70A-3-301.   Person entitled to enforce instrument.

"Person entitled to enforce" an instrument means the holder of the instrument, a nonholder in possession of the instrument who has the rights of a holder, or a person not in possession of the instrument who is entitled to enforce the instrument pursuant to Section 70A-3-309 or Subsection 70A-3-418(4).  A person may be a person entitled to enforce the instrument even though he is not the owner of the instrument or is in wrongful possession of the instrument.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 237, 1993 General Session

